Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1290.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 63 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3121. Advisory opinions and notices.(a) Advisory opinions.--(1) Upon receipt of a written request from an individual holding a license, registration, certificate or permit with a licensing board or licensing commission, the respective licensing board or licensing commission shall issue a written advisory opinion to the licensee interpreting or clarifying the applicability of a statute or regulation relevant to the license, registration, certificate or permit.(2) A licensing board or licensing commission shall issue an advisory opinion within 30 business days of 123456789101112131415161718 receiving a request under paragraph (1), unless the licensing board or licensing commission extends the period for good cause.(3) An advisory opinion shall not require a formal vote by a licensing board or licensing commission.(4) An advisory opinion shall be binding on the issuing licensing board or licensing commission solely with respect to the licensee to whom it is issued.(5) An advisory opinion shall be deemed a public record accessible under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, and may be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the issuing licensing board or licensing commission.(b) Advisory notices.--A licensing board or licensing commission shall issue advisory notices to provide general guidance on specific topics, including, but not limited to, changes in statutes or regulations or subjects of widespread interest to the public or licensees.(c) Regulations.--Each licensing board or licensing commission shall promulgate regulations to implement this section within 18 months of the effective date of this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1290PN1471 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223